Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-549
Deposits with State Treasurer; amount required; proof of financial responsibility.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the certificate of the State Treasurer that the person named in the certificate has deposited with him or her seventy-five thousand dollars per vehicle in cash or securities such as may legally be purchased by savings banks or for trust funds of a market value of seventy-five thousand dollars. The State Treasurer shall not accept any such deposit and issue a certificate therefor and the department shall not accept such certificate unless it is accompanied by evidence that there are no unsatisfied judgments of any character against the depositor in the county where the depositor resides.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 49, p. 499;

Laws 1959, c. 299, § 4, p. 1126;

Laws 1975, LB 264, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1051, § 1.